Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2104, as


amended by Section 237, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (68 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 2104), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2104. A. The value of any motor vehicle, except a


manufactured home, for the purposes of the excise tax levied by


Section 2103 of this title, shall be determined as of the time the


person applying for a certificate of title thereto obtained either


ownership or possession of the vehicle, which shall be presumed to


be the actual date of the sale or other transfer of ownership, and


assignment of the certificate of title.



Req. No. 10327 Page 1


B. 1. The value of any vehicle, for purposes of the excise tax


levied by Section 2103 of this title, shall be the actual sales


price of such a vehicle before after any discounts or credits are


given for a trade-in. However, the value


2. For purposes of computing the maximum value or the minimum


value of the vehicle to calculate the amount of motor vehicle excise


tax due, and notwithstanding the actual sales price of the vehicle


as negotiated between the seller and buyer, the sales price of the


vehicle prior to the subtraction of such discounts or credits for a


trade-in shall be required to be within twenty percent (20%) of the


average retail price value of such vehicle as listed in the


automotive reference material prescribed by Service Oklahoma.


3. The actual sales price value of the vehicle as computed in


paragraph 1 of this subsection, which total shall be the basis of


the motor vehicle excise tax, as well as including:


a. the sales price of the vehicle for the purposes of


paragraph 2 of this subsection,


b. the number of tires on the vehicle, and


c. the tire rim diameters,


shall be entered on the bill of sale furnished by the seller to the


purchaser, or on such other form as may be prescribed by Service


Oklahoma.


C. Upon receipt of the properly completed bill of sale or other


form as prescribed by Service Oklahoma, and the payment of all

Req. No. 10327 Page 2


applicable taxes and fees, Service Oklahoma or an appointed licensed


operator shall issue a vehicle certificate of title in accordance


with the provisions of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration


Act.


D. On or before November 1, 2026, Service Oklahoma shall file a


report with the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of


Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State


Senate, the Chair of the Appropriations and Budget Committee of the


House of Representatives, and the Chair of the Appropriations


Committee of the Senate. The report shall state the fiscal impact


of the motor vehicle excise tax over the previous three (3) fiscal


years, the future projections of the motor vehicle excise tax, and


any other information important to the implementation and fiscal


impact of the motor vehicle excise tax.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-10327 AO 12/04/24















Req. No. 10327 Page 3